Colorado, session 2026A, SB183.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-36-125 as
follows:
24-36-125. Financed purchase of an asset or certificate of
participation agreements - fund capital costs related to a project at
Colorado school of mines - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "AGREEMENT" MEANS ONE OR MORE FINANCED PURCHASE OF
AN ASSET OR CERTIFICATE OF PARTICIPATION AGREEMENTS EXECUTED AS
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) "BOARD" MEANS THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE COLORADO
SCHOOL OF MINES, CREATED IN SECTION 23-41-102 (1)(a).
(2) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF SECTIONS
24-82-102 (1)(b) AND 24-82-801, AND PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-36-121,
-2- 183

NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE STATE, ACTING BY AND
THROUGH THE STATE TREASURER, SHALL EXECUTE AN AGREEMENT FOR
THE PURPOSE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION, THE TOTAL
AMOUNT OF THE PRINCIPAL OF WHICH AGREEMENT SHALL NOT EXCEED
THIRTEEN MILLION DOLLARS, PLUS REASONABLE AND NECESSARY
ADMINISTRATIVE, MONITORING, AND CLOSING COSTS AND INTEREST,
INCLUDING CAPITALIZED INTEREST.
(b) THE ANTICIPATED ANNUAL STATE-FUNDED PAYMENTS FOR THE
PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST COMPONENTS OF THE AMOUNT PAYABLE UNDER
AN AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL NOT EXCEED THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN SEVENTEEN
MILLION FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS AND THE AMOUNT OF THE
ANNUAL STATE-FUNDED PAYMENTS FOR THE AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-36-124 (2)(b), WITH PRINCIPAL AMORTIZATION
NOT OCCURRING BEFORE JULY 1, 2027.
(c) THE STATE, ACTING BY AND THROUGH THE STATE TREASURER,
AT THE STATE TREASURER'S SOLE DISCRETION, MAY ENTER INTO AN
AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED BY SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION WITH
ANY FOR-PROFIT OR NONPROFIT CORPORATION, TRUST, OR COMMERCIAL
BANK ACTING AS A TRUSTEE AS THE LESSOR.
(d) THE AGREEMENT MUST PROVIDE THAT ALL OBLIGATIONS OF
THE STATE UNDER THE AGREEMENT ARE SUBJECT TO THE ACTION OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN ANNUALLY MAKING MONEY AVAILABLE FOR ALL
PAYMENTS THEREUNDER. PAYMENTS UNDER THE AGREEMENT MUST BE
MADE SUBJECT TO ANNUAL APPROPRIATION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY,
AS APPLICABLE, FROM THE GENERAL FUND OR FROM ANY OTHER LEGALLY
AVAILABLE SOURCE OF MONEY.
-3- 183

(e) THE AGREEMENT MUST ALSO PROVIDE THAT THE OBLIGATIONS
OF THE STATE DO NOT CREATE STATE DEBT WITHIN THE MEANING OF ANY
PROVISION OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR STATE LAW CONCERNING OR
LIMITING THE CREATION OF STATE DEBT AND THAT THE OBLIGATIONS ARE
NOT A MULTIPLE FISCAL-YEAR DIRECT OR INDIRECT DEBT OR OTHER
FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OF THE STATE WITHIN THE MEANING OF SECTION
20 (4) OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION. IF THE STATE DOES NOT
RENEW THE AGREEMENT, THE SOLE SECURITY AVAILABLE TO THE LESSOR
IS THE PROPERTY THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE NONRENEWED AGREEMENT.
(f) (I) THE AGREEMENT MAY CONTAIN TERMS, PROVISIONS, AND
CONDITIONS AS THE STATE TREASURER, ACTING ON BEHALF OF THE STATE,
DEEMS APPROPRIATE, INCLUDING ALL OPTIONAL TERMS; EXCEPT THAT THE
AGREEMENT MUST SPECIFICALLY AUTHORIZE THE STATE OR THE BOARD TO
RECEIVE FEE TITLE TO ALL REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY THAT IS THE
SUBJECT OF THE AGREEMENT ON OR BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF THE
TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER, ACTING ON BEHALF OF THE STATE, HAS
THE AUTHORITY TO DETERMINE WHAT COLLATERAL TO USE FOR THE
AGREEMENT AS THE STATE TREASURER DEEMS APPROPRIATE.
(g) THE AGREEMENT MAY PROVIDE FOR THE ISSUANCE,
DISTRIBUTION, AND SALE OF INSTRUMENTS EVIDENCING RIGHTS TO
RECEIVE RENTALS AND OTHER PAYMENTS MADE AND TO BE MADE UNDER
THE AGREEMENT. THE INSTRUMENTS MAY BE ISSUED, DISTRIBUTED, OR
SOLD ONLY BY THE LESSOR OR ANY PERSON DESIGNATED BY THE LESSOR
AND NOT BY THE STATE. THE INSTRUMENTS DO NOT CREATE A
RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN THE PURCHASERS OF THE INSTRUMENTS AND THE
STATE OR CREATE ANY OBLIGATION ON THE PART OF THE STATE TO THE
-4- 183

PURCHASERS. THE INSTRUMENTS ARE NOT A NOTE, BOND, OR OTHER
EVIDENCE OF STATE DEBT WITHIN THE MEANING OF ANY PROVISION OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION OR STATE LAW CONCERNING OR LIMITING THE
CREATION OF STATE DEBT AND THE INSTRUMENTS ARE NOT A MULTIPLE
FISCAL-YEAR DIRECT OR INDIRECT DEBT OR OTHER FINANCIAL OBLIGATION
OF THE STATE WITHIN THE MEANING OF SECTION 20 (4) OF ARTICLE X OF
THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(h) INTEREST PAID UNDER AN AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING INTEREST
REPRESENTED BY THE INSTRUMENTS, IS EXEMPT FROM COLORADO INCOME
TAX.
(i) THE STATE, ACTING BY AND THROUGH THE STATE TREASURER
AND THE BOARD, IS AUTHORIZED TO ENTER INTO ANCILLARY AGREEMENTS
AND INSTRUMENTS THAT ARE NECESSARY OR APPROPRIATE IN
CONNECTION WITH AN AGREEMENT, INCLUDING DEEDS, GROUND LEASES,
SUBLEASES, EASEMENTS, OR OTHER INSTRUMENTS RELATED TO THE REAL
PROPERTY ON WHICH THE FACILITIES ARE LOCATED.
(j) THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 24-30-202 (5)(b) DO NOT APPLY
TO AN AGREEMENT OR TO ANY ANCILLARY AGREEMENT OR INSTRUMENT
ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2). THE STATE
CONTROLLER OR THEIR DESIGNEE SHALL WAIVE ANY PROVISION OF THE
FISCAL RULES PROMULGATED PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 24-30-202 (1) AND
(13) THAT THE STATE CONTROLLER FINDS INCOMPATIBLE OR INAPPLICABLE
WITH RESPECT TO AN AGREEMENT OR AN ANCILLARY AGREEMENT OR
INSTRUMENT.
(3) (a) BEFORE EXECUTING THE AGREEMENT, TO PROTECT AGAINST
FUTURE INTEREST RATE INCREASES, THE STATE, ACTING BY AND THROUGH
-5- 183

THE STATE TREASURER AND AT THE DISCRETION OF THE STATE
TREASURER, MAY ENTER INTO AN INTEREST RATE EXCHANGE AGREEMENT
PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 59.3 OF TITLE 11. THE INTEREST RATE EXCHANGE
AGREEMENT IS A PROPOSED PUBLIC SECURITY FOR THE PURPOSES OF
ARTICLE 59.3 OF TITLE 11. ANY PAYMENTS MADE BY THE STATE UNDER AN
INTEREST RATE EXCHANGE AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3) MUST BE MADE SOLELY FROM MONEY AVAILABLE TO THE
STATE TREASURER FROM THE EXECUTION OF THE AGREEMENT ENTERED
INTO PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION OR FROM MONEY
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(d) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) AN INTEREST RATE EXCHANGE AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3) MUST ALSO PROVIDE THAT THE
OBLIGATIONS OF THE STATE DO NOT CREATE STATE DEBT WITHIN THE
MEANING OF ANY PROVISION OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR STATE LAW
CONCERNING OR LIMITING THE CREATION OF STATE DEBT OR ANY
MULTIPLE FISCAL-YEAR DIRECT OR INDIRECT DEBT OR OTHER FINANCIAL
OBLIGATION OF THE STATE WITHIN THE MEANING OF SECTION 20 (4) OF
ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(c) ANY MONEY RECEIVED BY THE STATE UNDER AN INTEREST
RATE EXCHANGE AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (3) MUST BE USED TO MAKE PAYMENTS ON AN AGREEMENT
ENTERED INTO PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION OR TO PAY
THE COSTS RELATED TO THE PURPOSES SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4) OF
THIS SECTION FOR WHICH AN AGREEMENT WAS EXECUTED.
(4) THE PROCEEDS OF AN AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION MUST BE USED TO FUND CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION COSTS RELATED TO THE RENEWAL, PHYSICAL
-6- 183

IMPROVEMENT, AND FUNCTIONAL IMPROVEMENT OF CRITICAL BUILDING
SYSTEMS IN THE COLORADO SCHOOL OF MINES' GUGGENHEIM HALL.
SECTION 2. Capital construction appropriation. For the
2026-27 state fiscal year, the general assembly anticipates that the
department of higher education will receive $13,000,000 in cash funds
from the proceeds of the financed purchase of an asset or certificate of
participation agreements executed pursuant to section 24-36-125, C.R.S.
This figure is subject to the "(I)" notation as defined in the annual general
appropriation act for the same fiscal year. To implement this act, the
department is anticipated to use this amount for Guggenheim hall HVAC
and plumbing improvements at the Colorado school of mines.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-7- 183